nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Watersporten met motorische aandrijving > Sleeplijnen voor watersport: Lijnen voor funtubes; Wakeboard- en wakesurflijnen en -handvatten; Waterskilijnen en -handvatten; Trekharnassen en v-lijnen voor watersport
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Trukket vannsport > Trekkabler for vannsport: Tau til slepetuber; Tau og håndtak til wakeboard og wakesurf; Tau og håndtak til vannski; Slepeseler og liner til vannsport
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Sports nautiques tractés > Câbles de traction pour sports nautiques: Cordes pour bouées tractables; Cordes et palonniers de wakeboard et wakesurf; Cordes et palonniers de ski nautique; Harnais de remorquage et brides de sports nautiques
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Seilgebundene Wassersportarten > Zugseile für Wassersport: Zugleinen für Tubes; Wakeboard- & Wakesurf-Leinen & -Hanteln; Wasserski-Leinen & -Hanteln; Wassersport-Zuggurte & -Zugdreiecke
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Vučni vodeni sportovi > Kabel za vuču za vodene sportove: Užad za vuču; Užad i ručke za wakeboard i wakesurf; Užad i ručke za skije za vodu; Pojasevi i uzda za vuču za vodene sportove
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Катание по воде за катером > Тросы для катания по воде за катером: Фалы для буксируемых баллонов; Фалы и рукоятки для вейкбординга и вейксерфинга; Фалы и рукоятки для водных лыж; Буксировочные тросы и обвязки для водного спорта
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Çekmeli Su Sporları > Su Sporu Çekme Kabloları: Şişme bot çekme halatları; Wakeboard ve wakesurf halat ve tutamaçları; Su kayağı halat ve tutamaçları; Su sporu çekme askıları ve kayışları
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Sport nautici con traino > Corde da traino per sport acquatici: Corde per gonfiabili da traino; Corde e maniglie per wakeboard e wakesurf; Corde e maniglie per sci d'acqua; Imbracature e briglie da traino per sport acquatici
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Sporty wodne holowane > Liny do holowania łodzi: Liny do holowania kół wodnych; Liny i uchwyty do wakeboardingu i wakesurfingu; Liny i uchwyty do nart wodnych; Uprzęże holownicze i orczyki do sportów wodnych
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 滑水用品 > 水上运动牵引缆绳: 水上充气圈拖绳; 尾波板与尾波冲浪板拖绳及把手; 滑水拖绳与把手; 水上运动牵引带与牵引绳
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Vandsport, hvor man trækkes > Trækkabler til vandsport: Træktove til baderinge; Træktove og håndtag til wakeboards og wakesurfing; Træktove og håndtag til vandski; Trækseler og hanefødder til vandsport
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vontatott vízi sportok > Vízisport-vontatókábelek: Vontatható fánkkötelek; Wakeboard- és wakesurf-kötelek és -fogantyúk; Vízisíkötelek és -fogantyúk; Vízisport-vonóhámok és -kantárok
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä > Vesiurheilulajien vetoköydet: Vetorengasköydet; Wakeboard- ja wakesurf-köydet ja -kahvat; Vesihiihtoköydet ja -kahvat; Vesiurheilun vetovaljaat ja -kolmiot
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก > สายลากสำหรับกีฬาทางน้ำ: เชือกลากห่วงยาง; เชือกและมือจับเวคบอร์ดและเวคเซิร์ฟ; เชือกและมือจับสกีน้ำ; สายรัดและเชือกพ่วงลากกีฬาทางน้ำ
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Vattensporter med draglina > Draglinor för vattensporter: Linor till åktuber; Linor och handtag för wakeboard och wakesurf; Linor och handtag för vattenskidor; Dragselar och hanfötter för vattensport
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 纜繩滑水 > 滑水繩: 拖曳氣墊船牽引繩; 尾波滑水與快艇衝浪繩及把手; 滑水繩與把手; 水上運動拖曳安全帶與韁繩
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Водни спортове с теглене > Въжета за теглене за водни спортове: Въжета за теглене на надуваеми водни атракциони; Въжета и ръкохватки за уейкборд и уейксърф; Въжета и ръкохватки за водни ски; Колани и въжета за теглене при водни спортове
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Towed Water Sports > Water Sport Tow Cables: Towable Tube Ropes; Wakeboard & Wakesurf Ropes & Handles; Water Ski Ropes & Handles; Water Sport Tow Harnesses & Bridles
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos aquáticos de reboque > Cabos para desportos aquáticos de reboque: Cordas para boias de reboque; Cordas e pegas para wakeboard e wakesurf; Cordas e pegas para esqui aquático; Arneses e triângulos de reboque para desportos aquáticos
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván có thuyền kéo > Cáp kéo thể thao dưới nước: Dây kéo phao bơi; Dây và tay cầm wakeboard & wakesurf; Dây và tay cầm trượt nước; Đai và dây nối kéo thể thao dưới nước
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > トーイングアクティビティ > トーイングロープ: トーイングチューブ用ロープ; ウェイクボード・ウェイクサーフ用ロープ・ハンドル; ウォータースキーロープ・ハンドル; ウォータースポーツ用トウハーネス・ブライドル
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Vlečni športi na vodi > Vlečne vrvi za vodne športe: Vrvi za vlečne vodne rekvizite; Vrvi in ročaji za wakeboard in wakesurf deske; Vrvi in ročaji za vodne smuči; Vlečni pasovi in povezovalni sistemi za vodne športe
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Esportes aquáticos rebocados > Cabos para reboque em esportes aquáticos: Cordas para boias rebocáveis; Cordas e manetes para wakeboard e wakesurf; Cordas e manetes para esqui aquático; Arneses e rédeas de reboque para esportes aquáticos
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Deportes acuáticos remolcados > Cables de remolque: Cuerdas para tubos remolcables; Cuerdas y manillares para wakeboard y wakesurf; Cuerdas y manillares para esquí acuático; Arneses y bridas de remolque para deportes acuáticos
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Vlečné vodné športy > Vlečné laná pre vodné športy: Ťažné rúrkové laná; Lana a úchyty na wakeboard a wakesurf; Lana a úchyty na vodné lyžovanie; Postroje a lanové mostíky pre vodné športy
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Sporturi nautice cu remorcare > Cabluri de remorcare pentru sporturi nautice: Frânghie pentru colac tractabil; Frânghii și mânere pentru wakeboard și wakesurfing; Frânghii și mânere pentru schi nautic; Hamuri și frâie de remorcare pentru sporturi nautice
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση > Καλώδια έλξης για θαλάσσια σπορ: Σχοινιά ρυμούλκησης για tubes; Σχοινιά και λαβές wakeboard και wakesurf; Σχοινιά και λαβές θαλάσσιου σκι; Ιμάντες και τρίγωνα έλξης ρυμούλκησης θαλάσσιων σπορ
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Velkamasis vandens sportas > Vandens sporto vilkimo trosai: Pripučiamų vilkimo padangų lynai; Wakeboard ir Wakesurf lynai ir rankenos; Vandens slidžių lynai ir rankenos; Vandens sporto tempimo diržai ir bridžai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Vlečné vodní sporty > Vlečná lana pro vodní sporty: Tažná lana k tubám; Lana a madla na wakeboarding a wakesurfing; Lana a madla na vodní lyže; Vlečné postroje a ohlávky pro vodní sporty
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 견인식 수상 스포츠 > 수상 스포츠 견인 케이블: 견인용 튜브 로프; 웨이크보드 및 웨이크서프 로프 및 핸들; 수상스키 로프 및 핸들; 수상 스포츠 견인 하네스 및 브라이들